Hawaii statutes.
[§52D-15] Off-duty police officers;
benefits for personal injuries. For the purposes of chapters 88 and 386, a
police officer who is injured, disabled, or killed while actually engaged in
the apprehension or attempted apprehension of law violators or suspected law
violators, or in the preservation of peace, or in the protection of the rights
or property of persons shall be deemed to have been injured, disabled, or
killed while in the actual performance of duty, and the injury, disability, or
death shall be deemed to have been caused by accident arising out of and in the
course of the police officer's employment, notwithstanding that the accident
causing the injury, disability, or death occurred at a time, place, or time and
place, not within the police officer's regular tour of duty and notwithstanding
that the police officer was not acting under the direction of the police
officer's superiors at the time and place of the accident; provided that the
accident occurs within the jurisdiction wherein the police officer is
commissioned and while the police officer is acting solely as a police officer.
[L 1993, c 290, §1]

Cross References

Retirement benefits, see §88-158.

Workers' compensation, see §386-3.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next